Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.770

Inspection or grading of commodities—Unlawful practices—Penalty.

Any department employee who shall, directly or indirectly, accept any money or other consideration for any neglect of duty or any improper performance of duty as such department employee; or any person who shall knowingly cause or attempt to cause the issuance of a false or incorrect grade or weight certificate under this chapter by deceptive loading, handling, or sampling of commodities or by submitting commodities for inspection knowing that it has been so loaded, handled, or sampled, or by any other means; shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 124 s 44. Formerly RCW 22.09.440.]